en: Rindswurst, Frankfurter Rindswurst
de: Rindswurst

en: Pickled sausages
fr: Saucisses confites
hr: Kisele kobasice
hu: Pácolt kolbász
nl: Ingemaakte worst

en: Utopenci, Utopenec
fr: Utopenci, Utopenec

en: Cured liver sausages, Liver sausages
fr: Saucisses sèches de foie, Saucisses de foie

en: Pork liver sausages
de: Schweineleberwürste, Schweineleberwurst
fr: Saucisses de foie de porc
hr: Kobasice od svinjske jetre
it: Salsicce di fegato di suino
nl: Varkensleverworsten

en: Pork and cabbage sausages
fr: Saucisses de porc aux choux, Saucisses aux choux, saucisses aux choux vaudoise
hu: Sertés Májkolbászok

en: French sausages, Sausages from France
ca: Embotits francesos, Embotits de França
de: Französische Würste, Würste aus Frankreich
es: salchicha francesa
fi: ranskalaiset makkarat
fr: Saucisses françaises, Saucisses de France
he: נקניקיות צרפתיות
hr: Francuske kobasice
hu: Francia kolbász
it: Salsicce francesi
nl: Franse worsten
pl: Kiełbasa francuska
pt: Salsichas francesas, Salsichas da França
ru: Французские колбасы
zh: 法国香肠

bg: Фует
es: Fuet
fr: Fouets catalans, fuet
nl: Fuet

en: Chipolatas, Chipolata slim sausage
xx: Chipolatas

en: Cooked chipolata sausages
fr: Chipolatas cuites

en: Lorrain Sausages
fr: Fuseau de lorrain
hr: Lorrain kobasice
nl: Worst uit de Lorraine

en: Sausage from Savoy
fr: Diots de Savoie

en: Landjäger sausages, Smoked Alsatian sausage
fr: Saucisses gendarmes, Saucisse alsacienne fumée, Gendarme fumé

en: Lyon sausage, Lyon sausages
fr: Saucisses de Lyon, Saucisse de Lyon
hr: Lionska kobasica
nl: Worst uit Lyon

en: Molène sausage
fr: Saucisses de Molène

en: Montbéliard sausages
fr: Saucisses de Montbéliard
hr: Montbéliard kobasice
nl: Worst uit Montbéliard

en: Morteau sausages
fr: Saucisses de Morteau, Saucisse de Morteau, Jésus de Morteau
hr: Morteau kobasice
it: Salsicce di Morteau
nl: Worst uit Morteau, Worsten uit Morteau

en: Morteaux sausage boiled in water, Morteaux sausage cooked in water
fr: Saucisse de Morteau bouillie

en: Strasbourg sausages
de: Straßburger Würstchen
es: Salchichas de estrasburgo
fr: Saucisses de Strasbourg, Knacks
hr: Strasbourške kobasice
it: Salsicce di Strasburgo
nl: Worst uit Straatsburg

en: Industrial knacks
es: salchicha cocidas
fr: Knacks industrielles, Knackis, Knacki
hr: Industrijske umjeće
it: Knack industriali
nl: Industriële knakworst